District of Columbia statutes.
7-2813

Trial.

(a)

Unless otherwise provided, the conduct of any civil trial commenced pursuant to § 7-2812 shall be governed by the Rules of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

(b)

In such trial, the complaint of a violation of this chapter shall be brought in the name of the District of Columbia by the Corporation Counsel. The burden of proof shall be upon the District of Columbia and no violation of this chapter may be established except upon proof by a preponderance of the evidence.

History

Sept. 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-107, § 14, 27 DCR 3760

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-2812.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3113.